cji.noun.morphology.lexd
PATTERNS

# Nom Sg
NounNomSgForm [<noun><sg><nom>:]

# Nom Pl
NounNomPlForm [<noun><pl><nom>:]

# Genitive-like Sg
NounGenSgStem [<noun><sg>:] NounGenLikeCase

# Dative-like Sg
NounGenSgStem|NounGeneratedDatSgStem [<noun><sg>:] NounDatLikeCase

# Not-nominative Pl
NounNomPlForm|NounGeneratedOblPlStem [<noun><pl>:] NounDatLikeCase|NounGenLikeCase


LEXICON NounDatLikeCase
<dat>:лъа
<aff>:хе[gig] # affective case exists only in Gigatlian dialect
<apud.ess>:хе[vgakv] # III in Magomedova, II in Bokarev
<apud.el>:хоо[vgakv]
<apud.lat>:хе[vgakv]
<apud.lat>:хал[vgakv]
<in.ess>:а2[vgakv] # V in Magomedova, III in Bokarev
<in.el>:аноо[vgakv]
<in.lat>:и[vgakv]
<in.lat>:ал[vgakv]

LEXICON NounGenLikeCase
<erg>:д
<gen>:лI
<gen>:лIе # according to Bokarev
<gen>:лIи # according to Magomedova
<super.ess>:чI[vgakv] # I in Magomedova and in Bokarev
<super.el>:чIоо[vgakv]
<super.lat>:оол[vgakv]
<super.lat>:оо[vgakv]
<cont.ess>:хъ[vgakv] # II in Magomedova and in Bokarev
<cont.ess>:хъе[vgakv]
<cont.el>:хъоо[vgakv]
<cont.lat>:хъе[vgakv]
<cont.lat>:хъал[vgakv]
<inter.ess>:лIа2[vgakv] # IV in Magomedova, III in Bokarev
<inter.el>:лIаноо[vgakv]
<inter.lat>:лIи[vgakv]
<inter.lat>:лIал[vgakv]
<sub.ess>:кьа2[vgakv] # VI in Magomedova, IV in Bokarev
<sub.el>:кьаноо[vgakv]
<sub.lat>:кьи[vgakv]
<sub.lat>:кьал[vgakv]
<loc.ess>:ла[gig] # I in Magomedova
<loc.el>:лур[gig]
<loc.lat>:ла[gig]
<super.ess>:чIу[gig] # II in Magomedova
<super.el>:чIур[gig]
<super.lat>:чIу[gig]
<cont.ess>:хъи[gig] # III in Magomedova
<cont.lat>:хъу[gig]
<apud.ess>:хи[gig] # IV in Magomedova
<apud.el>:хур[gig]
<apud.lat>:ху[gig]
<inter.ess>:лIи[gig] # V in Magomedova
<inter.el>:лIур[gig]
<inter.lat>:лIу[gig]
<in.ess>:ни[gig] # VI in Magomedova
<in.el>:нур[gig]
<in.lat>:ну[gig]
<sub.ess>:кьи[gig] # VII in Magomedova
<sub.el>:кьур[gig]
<sub.lat>:кьу[gig]
